Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5815
Certificate of authority; suspension or revocation; grounds; administrative penalty; authorized.

(1) The director shall suspend or revoke the certificate of authority as a third-party administrator if the director finds that the third-party administrator:

(a) Is in an unsound financial condition;

(b) Is using such methods or practices in the conduct of its business so as to render its further transaction of business in this state hazardous or injurious to certificate holders, subscribers, or the public; or

(c) Has failed to pay any judgment rendered against it in this state within sixty days after the judgment has become final.

(2) The director may, in his or her discretion, suspend or revoke the certificate of authority as a third-party administrator if the director finds that the third-party administrator:

(a) Has violated any lawful rule or regulation or order of the director or any provision of the insurance laws of this state;

(b) Has refused to be examined or to produce its accounts, records, and files for examination or if any of its officers has refused to give information with respect to its affairs or has refused to perform any other legal obligation as to such examination, when required by the director;

(c) Has, without just cause, refused to pay proper claims or perform services arising under its contracts or has, without just cause, caused certificate holders, subscribers, or claimants to accept less than the amount due them or caused certificate holders, subscribers, or claimants to retain attorneys or bring actions against the third-party administrator to secure full payment or settlement of such claims;

(d) Is affiliated with or under the same general management or interlocking directorate or ownership as another third-party administrator or insurer which unlawfully transacts business in this state without having a certificate of authority as a third-party administrator;

(e) At any time fails to meet any qualification for which issuance of the certificate of authority as a third-party administrator could have been refused had such failure then existed and been known to the director;

(f) Has been convicted of or has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a felony without regard to whether adjudication was withheld; or

(g) Is under suspension or revocation in another state.

(3) The director may, in his or her discretion and without advance notice or hearing thereon, immediately suspend the certificate of authority as a third-party administrator if the director finds that one or more of the following circumstances exist:

(a) The third-party administrator is insolvent or impaired;

(b) A proceeding for supervision, rehabilitation, conservation, receivership, or other delinquency proceeding regarding the third-party administrator has been commenced in any state; or

(c) The financial condition or business practices of the third-party administrator otherwise pose an imminent threat to the public health, safety, or welfare of the residents of this state.

(4) Except as provided in subsection (4) of section 44-5814, if the director finds that one or more grounds exist for the suspension or revocation of a certificate of authority as a third-party administrator, the director may, in lieu of such suspension or revocation and after notice and hearing, impose an administrative penalty upon the third-party administrator in an amount not less than one thousand dollars nor more than ten thousand dollars.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 90;

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 43.